Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Chapter 5. Commutation and Valuation of Certain Estates and Interests.

§ 55.1-500.
Annuity table.

When a party as tenant for life is entitled to the annual interests on a sum of money, or is entitled to the use of any estate, or a part thereof, and is willing to accept a gross sum in lieu thereof, or the party liable for such interest, or affected by such claim, has the right to pay a gross sum in lieu thereof, or if the court in any legal proceeding orders a gross sum to be paid in lieu thereof, the sum shall be estimated according to the then value of an annuity of eight percent on the principal sum during the probable life of such person, according to the following table, showing in Column I the present value, on the basis of eight percent interest, of an annuity of $1, payable at the end of every year that a person of a given age may be living, for the ages therein stated:

PRESENT VALUE

Age last birthday I life II lives Less than one year 12.060 11.670 1 12.291 12.124 2 12.291 12.127 3 12.286 12.120 4 12.278 12.107 5 12.267 12.091 6 12.256 12.071 7 12.242 12.049 8 12.227 12.024 9 12.211 11.996 10 12.192 11.965 11 12.171 11.930 12 12.149 11.892 13 12.125 11.852 14 12.102 11.812 15 12.078 11.773 16 12.055 11.736 17 12.032 11.701 18 12.010 11.666 19 11.988 11.632 20 11.964 11.596 21 11.939 11.559 22 11.913 11.521 23 11.886 11.480 24 11.857 11.437 25 11.824 11.389 26 11.789 11.336 27 11.751 11.278 28 11.709 11.215 29 11.664 11.148 30 11.615 11.075 31 11.564 10.998 32 11.510 10.917 33 11.452 10.831 34 11.391 10.741 35 11.326 10.645 36 11.258 10.545 37 11.186 10.440 38 11.110 10.331 39 11.031 10.217 40 10.948 10.098 41 10.861 9.975 42 10.770 9.847 43 10.675 9.714 44 10.576 9.576 45 10.473 9.434 46 10.365 9.288 47 10.254 9.138 48 10.138 8.983 49 10.018 8.824 50 9.893 8.661 51 9.764 8.493 52 9.631 8.322 53 9.493 8.147 54 9.352 7.970 55 9.207 7.790 56 9.057 7.608 57 8.904 7.423 58 8.747 7.237 59 8.586 7.048 60 8.421 6.856 61 8.252 6.662 62 8.078 6.466 63 7.900 6.267 64 7.718 6.067 65 7.532 5.865 66 7.343 5.663 67 7.150 5.460 68 6.954 5.256 69 6.755 5.052 70 6.552 4.847 71 6.345 4.640 72 6.134 4.431 73 5.920 4.222 74 5.705 4.015 75 5.491 3.812 76 5.279 3.615 77 5.069 3.424 78 4.861 3.239 79 4.654 3.057 80 4.448 2.879 81 4.244 2.706 82 4.044 2.538 83 3.846 2.376 84 3.652 2.217 85 3.459 2.061 86 3.272 1.911 87 3.097 1.774 88 2.934 1.651 89 2.780 1.537 90 2.630 1.426 91 2.485 1.319 92 2.350 1.220 93 2.227 1.131 94 2.118 1.053 95 2.024 0.986 96 1.943 0.931 97 1.873 0.885 98 1.811 0.845 99 1.754 0.810 100 1.701 0.779 101 1.651 0.751 102 1.602 0.726 103 1.550 0.703 104 1.492 0.682 105 1.420 0.661 106 1.322 0.637 107 1.178 0.602 108 0.955 0.535 109 0.595 0.383

Click to view

History.

1973, c. 355, § 55-269.1; 1981, c. 612; 1990, c. 831; 2019, c. 712.

Cross references.

As to augmented estates, see
§

64.2-305

.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Annuities, § 9.

§ 55.1-501.
Rule of calculation under § 55.1-500.

Calculate the interest at eight percent upon the sum to the income of which, or upon the value of the property to the use of which, the person is entitled. Multiply this interest by the present value of an annuity of $1, as set opposite the person’s age in the table, and the product is the gross value of the life estate of such person.

Example: Suppose a person whose age is 42 is a tenant for life in the whole of an estate worth $10,500. The annual interest on that sum at eight percent is $840. The present value of an annuity of $1 at the age of 42, as shown by the table, is $10.77, which, multiplied by $840, gives $9,046.80 as the gross value of such life estate in the premises, or the proceeds of such life estate.

History.

Code 1919, §§ 5132, 5133; 1946, p. 555; Code 1950, §§ 55-270, 55-271; 1973, c. 355; 1981, c. 612; 1990, c. 831; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Annuities, § 9.

§ 55.1-502.
Table of uniform seniority.

When any two parties, as joint tenants for life, are entitled to the annual interest on a sum of money, or are entitled to the use of any estate or a part thereof, and are willing to accept a gross sum in lieu thereof, or the party liable for such interest, or affected by such claim, has the right to pay a gross sum in lieu thereof, or if the court in any legal proceeding orders a gross sum to be paid in lieu thereof, the sum shall be estimated according to the then value of an annuity of eight percent on the principal sum during the probable joint lives of such persons (which probable joint lives shall be computed from the table in this section for computing uniform seniority) as set forth in Column II in the table in §

55.1-500

, showing the present value, on the basis of eight percent interest, of an annuity of $1 payable at the end of every year that two persons of given ages may both be living for the ages therein stated:

TABLE OF UNIFORM SENIORITY

Differenceofage Additiontoyounger age 1 1 2 1 3 2 4 2 5 3 6 4 7 4 8 5 9 6 10 7 11 7 12 8 13 9 14 10 15 11 16 12 17 13 18 14 19 14 20 15 21 16 22 17 23 18 24 19 25 20 26 21 27 22 28 23 29 24 30 25 31 26 32 27 33 28 34 29 35 30 36 31 37 32 38 33 39 34 40 35 41 36 42 37 43 38 44 39 45 40 46 41 47 42 48 43 49 44 50 45 51 46 52 47 53 48 54 49 55 50 56 51 57 52 58 53 59 54 60 55 61 56 62 57 63 58 64 59 65 60 66 61 67 62 68 63 69 64 70 65 71 66 72 67 73 68 74 69 75 70

Click to view

History.

1973, c. 355, § 55-272.1; 1981, c. 612; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Annuities, § 9.

§ 55.1-503.
Rules of calculation under § 55.1-502.

Calculate the interest at eight percent upon the sum to the income of which, or upon the value of the property to the use of which, the joint life tenants are entitled. Multiply this interest by the present value of an annuity of $1, as shown in Column II of §

55.1-500

, for the joint equal age of such joint life tenants. The joint equal age of such tenants shall be obtained as follows: Take the difference in age in years between such tenants and refer to the table in §

55.1-502

and add to the younger age the value opposite such difference, and the sum is the joint equal age; take this joint equal age and refer to the table in §

55.1-500

and find in Column II the value of an annuity of $1 a year payable for life during such joint equal age. The product of the interest and the value of an annuity for a given joint equal age is the gross value of the joint life estate of such person therein.

Example: Doe, age 30, and Roe, age 40, are joint tenants for life in the whole of an estate worth $10,500: The difference in ages is 10 and, as shown by the table in §

55.1-502

, the value opposite age difference 10 is seven. Seven added to 30, Doe’s age, gives 37; as shown by the table in §

55.1-500

, the value in Column II for an annuity of $1 for two joint lives at joint equal age 37 is $10.44 and no mills, and this, multiplied by $840 (the interest at eight percent on $10,000), gives $8,769.60 as the gross value of the joint life estate of such persons.

History.

1946, p. 556; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 5133a2; Code 1950, § 55-273; 1973, c. 355; 1981, c. 612; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Annuities, § 9.

§ 55.1-504.
Makehamized mortality table.

When more than two parties as joint tenants for life, or three or more parties as tenants in successive estates, are entitled to the annual interest on a sum of money, or are entitled to the use of any estate, or a part thereof, and are willing to accept a gross sum in lieu thereof, or the party liable for such interest, or affected by such claim, has the right to pay a gross sum in lieu thereof, or if the court in any legal proceeding orders a gross sum to be paid in lieu thereof, the sum shall be estimated according to the then value of an annuity of eight percent on the principal sum during the probable lives of such persons. Probable lives shall be computed from the Makehamized mortality table for total population in the United States, 1969-1971, published by the Bureau of the Census of the Department of Commerce.

X Ax Axx Axxx Axxxx Cx
0 12.060 11.670 11.305 10.958 1.000 1 12.291 12.124 11.973 11.832 1.147 2 12.291 12.127 11.979 11.843 1.315 3 12.286 12.120 11.971 11.834 1.508 4 12.278 12.107 11.956 11.816 1.730 5 12.267 12.091 11.934 11.791 1.984 6 12.256 12.071 11.909 11.760 2.275 7 12.242 12.049 11.879 11.724 2.609 8 12.227 12.024 11.846 11.684 2.992 9 12.211 11.996 11.809 11.638 3.431 10 12.192 11.965 11.766 11.587 3.935 11 12.171 11.930 11.720 11.529 4.512 12 12.149 11.892 11.668 11.466 5.175 13 12.125 11.852 11.615 11.401 5.935 14 12.102 11.812 11.562 11.336 6.806 15 12.078 11.773 11.510 11.274 7.805 16 12.055 11.736 11.462 11.215 8.951 17 12.032 11.701 11.416 11.162 10.265 18 12.010 11.666 11.373 11.111 11.772 19 11.988 11.632 11.330 11.062 13.501 20 11.964 11.596 11.286 11.011 15.483 21 11.939 11.559 11.240 10.959 17.756 22 11.913 11.521 11.193 10.905 20.362 23 11.886 11.480 11.144 10.850 23.352 24 11.857 11.437 11.091 10.789 26.780 25 11.824 11.389 11.032 10.723 30.712 26 11.789 11.336 10.968 10.649 35.221 27 11.751 11.278 10.896 10.567 40.392 28 11.709 11.215 10.818 10.478 46.321 29 11.664 11.148 10.734 10.382 53.122 30 11.615 11.075 10.645 10.279 60.921 31 11.564 10.998 10.550 10.171 69.865 32 11.510 10.917 10.450 10.056 80.122 33 11.452 10.831 10.344 9.936 91.885 34 11.391 10.741 10.233 9.809 105.375 35 11.326 10.645 10.117 9.677 120.845 36 11.258 10.545 9.995 9.539 138.586 37 11.186 10.440 9.868 9.396 158.932 38 11.110 10.331 9.735 9.247 182.266 39 11.031 10.217 9.599 9.094 209.024 40 10.948 10.098 9.457 8.936 239.712 41 10.861 9.975 9.311 8.773 274.904 42 10.770 9.847 9.159 8.605 315.263 43 10.675 9.714 9.002 8.432 361.548 44 10.576 9.576 8.841 8.256 414.627 45 10.473 9.434 8.677 8.076 475.500 46 10.365 9.288 8.508 7.893 545.309 47 10.254 9.138 8.336 7.707 625.367 48 10.138 8.983 8.160 7.517 717.178 49 10.018 8.824 7.979 7.234 822.468 50 9.893 8.661 7.796 7.129 943.217 51 9.764 8.493 7.608 6.930 1081.692 52 9.631 8.322 7.418 6.730 1240.497 53 9.493 8.147 7.226 6.529 1422.617 54 9.352 7.970 7.033 6.328 1631.475 55 9.207 7.790 6.838 6.127 1870.995 56 9.057 7.608 6.643 5.927 2145.679 57 8.904 7.423 6.447 5.727 2460.691 58 8.747 7.237 6.250 5.529 2821.950 59 8.586 7.048 6.053 5.331 3236.246 60 8.421 6.856 5.855 5.133 3711.365 61 8.252 6.662 5.656 4.936 4256.238 62 8.078 6.466 5.457 4.740 4881.105 63 7.900 6.267 5.257 4.544 5597.710 64 7.718 6.067 5.056 4.349 6419.521 65 7.532 5.865 4.857 4.157 7361.984 66 7.343 5.663 4.659 3.967 8442.811 67 7.150 5.460 4.462 3.780 9682.318 68 6.954 5.256 4.266 3.596 11103.798 69 6.755 5.052 4.072 3.414 12733.969 70 6.552 4.847 3.879 3.234 14603.468 71 6.345 4.640 3.685 3.055 16747.432 72 6.134 4.431 3.490 2.875 19206.157 73 5.920 4.222 3.296 2.697 22025.851 74 5.705 4.015 3.106 2.523 25259.510 75 5.491 3.812 2.922 2.356 28967.909 76 5.279 3.615 2.745 2.197 33220.746 77 5.069 3.424 2.577 2.047 38097.950 78 4.861 3.239 2.415 1.905 43691.186 79 4.654 3.057 2.258 1.768 50105.577 80 4.448 2.879 2.106 1.636 57461.677 81 4.244 2.706 1.959 1.509 65897.740 82 4.044 2.538 1.818 1.389 75572.319 83 3.846 2.376 1.684 1.276 86667.243 84 3.652 2.217 1.554 1.166 99391.034 85 3.459 2.061 1.425 1.058 113982.830 86 3.272 1.911 1.302 0.955 130716.878 87 3.097 1.774 1.192 0.863 149907.684 88 2.934 1.651 1.095 0.784 171915.931 89 2.780 1.537 1.007 0.713 197155.252 90 2.630 1.426 0.922 0.645 226100.009 91 2.485 1.319 0.839 0.579 259294.204 92 2.350 1.220 0.763 0.519 297361.704 93 2.227 1.131 0.695 0.465 341017.971 94 2.118 1.053 0.636 0.419 391083.501 95 2.024 0.986 0.586 0.380 448499.252 96 1.943 0.931 0.546 0.349 514344.324 97 1.873 0.885 0.512 0.324 589856.243 98 1.811 0.845 0.484 0.302 676454.218 99 1.754 0.810 0.459 0.284 775765.815 100 1.701 0.779 0.437 0.268 889657.545 101 1.651 0.751 0.417 0.254 1020269.949 102 1.602 0.726 0.400 0.241 1170057.821 103 1.550 0.703 0.385 0.230 1341836.349 104 1.492 0.682 0.372 0.221 1538834.028 105 1.420 0.661 0.359 0.212 1764753.329 106 1.322 0.637 0.348 0.205 2023840.295 107 1.178 0.602 0.335 0.197 2320964.336 108 0.955 0.535 0.312 0.188 2661709.752 109 0.595 0.383 0.246 0.158 3052480.684

Click to view

Example: Three persons, age 30, 40, and 45, are joint tenants for life in the whole of an estate worth $10,500: the equivalent equal age, w, of these three persons is given by the following formula:

C
+ C
+ C
3 0 4 0 4 5 C
=
= 258.711 where w 3 C , C , and C
are found in column 6 of the above table. 3 0 4 0 4 5

Click to view

A linear interpolation between x = 40 and x = 41 in the above table would yield the value of x = 40.540, which would be the equivalent equal age of the persons involved.

Finally, a linear interpolation between x = 40 and x = 41 would yield the value of A = 9.378 40.540:40.540:40.540.

This figure multiplied by $840 (the interest at eight percent on $10,500) gives $7,877.52 as the gross value of the joint life estate of such persons therein.

History.

1946, p. 557; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 5133a3; Code 1950, § 55-274; 1973, c. 355; 1981, c. 612; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Annuities, § 9.

§ 55.1-505.
Commutation in case of persons under disability.

In any case in which, under the laws of the Commonwealth, a provision is made for commutation in money of a life estate when all the parties interested are under no disability, such provision shall also apply when any of the parties interested are under disability. Where any of the parties interested are under disability, the court may, upon application of the guardian, conservator, committee, or trustee, if any, and, if not, by a guardian ad litem appointed by the clerk or judge of said court, of any such person, on behalf of his ward, and upon hearing evidence satisfactory to such court or judge, enter an order authorizing such guardian, conservator, committee, trustee, or guardian ad litem to consent on behalf of such person under disability to such commutation. Such consent shall be as valid and effective as if the person on whose behalf it was given were sui juris and had given such consent. All judicial orders and decrees entered prior to July 1, 1960, authorizing any such commutation where persons under disability were interested, are hereby validated and confirmed, provided that nothing in this section shall be construed as intended to impair any vested right.

History.

1926, p. 746; Michie Code 1942, § 5133b; 1948, p. 682; Code 1950, § 55-276; 1960, c. 45; 1997, c. 801; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Annuities, § 9.

§ 55.1-506.
Commutation of certain life estates.

Whenever a party as tenant for life, or in any other manner, has a life interest in an estate that has been sold under an action for partition or has been reduced to money, stocks, bonds, or notes, susceptible of division and when the total cost of holding such money, stocks, bonds, or notes intact amounts to more than eight percent of the gross annual income, and when the party owning such life estate is willing to accept a lump sum in lieu of such annual income, upon the application of such person entitled to such annual income to any court of record having jurisdiction over the subject matter, the court may order that such party or parties having charge of such money, stocks, bonds, or notes shall pay to the party having the right to receive such annual income a lump sum in accordance with §

55.1-500

. This section shall not affect any spendthrift trust.

History.

1926, p. 361; Michie Code 1942, § 5133a; Code 1950, § 55-277; 1973, c. 355; 1981, c. 612; 1990, c. 831; 2005, c. 681; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Annuities, § 9.